Hawaii statutes.
§87A-18 Long-term care benefits plan;
carrier or third-party administrator. (a) The board may establish a
long-term care benefits plan or plans for employee-beneficiaries; the spouses,
parents, grandparents, in-law parents, and in-law grandparents of employee-beneficiaries;
and qualified-beneficiaries. The plan or plans shall be at no cost to
employers and shall comply with article 10H of chapter 431.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, long-term care benefits shall be available only to:

(1) Employee-beneficiaries and their spouses,
parents, and grandparents;

(2) Employee-beneficiary in-law parents and
grandparents; and

(3) Qualified-beneficiaries who enroll between the
ages of twenty and eighty-five,

who comply with the plan's age, enrollment, medical
underwriting, and contribution requirements.

(c) The board may contract with a carrier to
provide fully insured benefits or with a third-party administrator to
administer self-insured benefits. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 216,
§14]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next